Tennessee, session 114, SB2640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-407, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1) and substituting:
(1) One (1) year and six (6) months, if the person does not have a prior
conviction as defined in subsection (e);
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2640
011388
- 1 -